src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_vyeijid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - vyeijiđ: # MLO checked ye
    vyeijiđ+V+Inf: vyeijiđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuájám
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuájáh
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuájá
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vyeijeen
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vyejivettee
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vyeijiv
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vyeijip
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vyejivetteđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vyejih
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuoijim
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vuoijih
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuojij
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vuojijm
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vuojijd
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vuojijn
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vuojijm
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuojijd
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuoijii
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: vuájáččim
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: vuájáččih
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: vuájáččij
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: vuájáččáim
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: vuájáččáid
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: vuájáččáin
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: vuájáččijm
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: vuájáččijd
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: vuájáččii
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: vyejeem
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: vyejeeh
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: vuojiš
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: vuojižeen
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: vuojišvettee
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: vuojižává
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: vuojižep
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: vuojišvetteđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: vuojižeh
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vyeje
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: vuájus
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: vuáijoon
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: vyeijee
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: vuáijus
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: vuáijup
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vyeijiđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: vuáijus
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vyeje
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuáijám
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: vuájáččii
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: vuájáá
    vyeijiđ+V+PrsPrc: vyeijee
    vyeijiđ+V+PrfPrc: vuáijám
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio+Nom: vyeijim
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio+Ess: vyejimin
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio+Loc: vyejimist
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio+Ill: vyejimân
    vyeijiđ+V+Ger: vyejedijn
    vyeijiđ+V+VAbess: vyejehánnáá
    vyeijiđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vyeješkuáđám
